Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20198-1111
Transactions exempt from registration.

Except as provided in this section, sections 8-1103 to 8-1109 shall not apply to any of the following transactions:

(1) Any isolated transaction, whether effected through a broker-dealer or not;

(2)(a) Any nonissuer transaction by a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer, and any resale transaction by a sponsor of a unit investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, in a security of a class that has been outstanding in the hands of the public for at least ninety days if, at the time of the transaction:

(i) The issuer of the security is actually engaged in business and not in the organization stage or in bankruptcy or receivership and is not a blank check, blind pool, or shell company whose primary plan of business is to engage in a merger or combination of the business with, or an acquisition of, an unidentified person or persons;

(ii) The security is sold at a price reasonably related to the current market price of the security;

(iii) The security does not constitute the whole or part of an unsold allotment to, or a subscription or participation by, the broker-dealer as an underwriter of the security;

(iv) A nationally recognized securities manual designated by rule and regulation or order of the director or a document filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission which is publicly available through the Electronic Data Gathering, Analysis, and Retrieval System (EDGAR) contains:

(A) A description of the business and operations of the issuer;

(B) The names of the issuer's officers and the names of the issuer's directors, if any, or, in the case of a non-United-States issuer, the corporate equivalents of such persons in the issuer's country of domicile;

(C) An audited balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within eighteen months or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when parties to the reorganization or merger had such audited balance sheet, a pro forma balance sheet; and

(D) An audited income statement for each of the issuer's immediately preceding two fiscal years, or for the period of existence of the issuer if in existence for less than two years, or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when the parties to the reorganization or merger had such audited income statement, a pro forma income statement; and

(v) The issuer of the security has a class of equity securities listed on a national securities exchange registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 unless:

(A) The issuer of the security is a unit investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940;

(B) The issuer of the security has been engaged in continuous business, including predecessors, for at least three years; or

(C) The issuer of the security has total assets of at least two million dollars based on an audited balance sheet as of a date within eighteen months or, in the case of a reorganization or merger when parties to the reorganization or merger had such audited balance sheet, a pro forma balance sheet; or

(b) Any nonissuer transaction in a security by a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer if:

(i) The issuer of the security is actually engaged in business and not in the organization stage or in bankruptcy or receivership and is not a blank check, blind pool, or shell company whose primary plan of business is to engage in a merger or combination of the business with, or an acquisition of, an unidentified person or persons; and

(ii) The security is senior in rank to the common stock of the issuer both as to payment of dividends or interest and upon dissolution or liquidation of the issuer and such security has been outstanding at least three years and the issuer or any predecessor has not defaulted within the current fiscal year or the three immediately preceding fiscal years in the payment of any dividend, interest, principal, or sinking fund installment on the security when due and payable.

The director may by order deny or revoke the exemption specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of subdivision (2) of this section with respect to a specific security. Upon the entry of such an order, the director shall promptly notify all registered broker-dealers that such order has been entered and the reasons for such order and that within fifteen business days after receipt of a written request the matter will be set for hearing. If no hearing is requested within fifteen business days of the issuance of the order and none is ordered by the director, the order shall automatically become a final order and shall remain in effect until modified or vacated by the director. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director shall, after notice of and opportunity for hearing to all interested persons, enter his or her written findings of fact and conclusions of law and may affirm, modify, or vacate the order. No such order shall operate retroactively. No person may be considered to have violated the Securities Act of Nebraska by reason of any offer or sale effected after the entry of any such order if he or she sustains the burden of proof that he or she did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the order;

(3) Any nonissuer transaction effected by or through a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer pursuant to an unsolicited order or offer to buy, but the director may by rule and regulation or order require that the customer acknowledge upon a specified form that the sale was unsolicited and that a signed copy of each such form be preserved by the broker-dealer for a specified period;

(4) Any transaction between the issuer or other person on whose behalf the offering is made and an underwriter or among underwriters;

(5) Any transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a real or chattel mortgage or deed of trust or by an agreement for the sale of real estate or chattels if the entire mortgage, deed of trust, or agreement, together with all the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness secured thereby, are offered and sold as a unit. Such exemption shall not apply to any transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a real estate mortgage or deed of trust or by an agreement for the sale of real estate if the real estate securing the evidences of indebtedness are parcels of real estate the sale of which requires the subdivision in which the parcels are located to be registered under the federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act, 15 U.S.C. 1701 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2019;

(6) Any transaction by an executor, personal representative, administrator, sheriff, marshal, receiver, guardian, or conservator;

(7) Any transaction executed by a bona fide pledgee without any purpose of evading the Securities Act of Nebraska;

(8)(a) Any offer or sale to any of the following, whether the purchaser is acting for itself or in some fiduciary capacity:

(i) A bank, savings institution, credit union, trust company, or other financial institution;

(ii) An insurance company;

(iii) An investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940;

(iv) A pension or profit-sharing trust;

(v) A broker-dealer;

(vi) A corporation with total assets in excess of five million dollars, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered;

(vii) A Massachusetts or similar business trust with total assets in excess of five million dollars, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered;

(viii) A partnership with total assets in excess of five million dollars, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered;

(ix) A trust with total assets in excess of five million dollars, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities, whose purchase is directed by a person who has such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters that he or she is capable of evaluating the merits and risks of the prospective investment;

(x) Any entity in which all of the equity owners are individuals who are individual accredited investors as defined in subdivision (b) of this subdivision;

(xi) An institutional buyer as may be defined by the director by rule and regulation or order; or

(xii) An individual accredited investor.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (8)(a) of this section, individual accredited investor means (i) any director, executive officer, or general partner of the issuer of the securities being offered or sold, or any director, executive officer, or general partner of a general partner of that issuer, (ii) any manager of a limited liability company that is the issuer of the securities being offered or sold, (iii) any natural person whose individual net worth, or joint net worth with that person's spouse, at the time of his or her purchase, exceeds one million dollars, excluding the value of the primary residence of such person, or (iv) any natural person who had an individual income in excess of two hundred thousand dollars in each of the two most recent years or joint income with that person's spouse in excess of three hundred thousand dollars in each of those years and has a reasonable expectation of reaching the same income level in the current year;

(9)(a) Any transaction pursuant to an offering in which sales are made to not more than fifteen persons, other than those designated in subdivisions (8), (11), and (17) of this section, in this state during any period of twelve consecutive months if (i) the seller reasonably believes that all the buyers are purchasing for investment, (ii) no commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer except to a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer, (iii) a notice generally describing the terms of the transaction and containing a representation that the conditions of this exemption are met is filed by the seller with the director within thirty days after the first sale for which this exemption is claimed, except that failure to give such notice may be cured by an order issued by the director in his or her discretion, and (iv) no general or public advertisements or solicitations are made.

(b) If a seller (i) makes sales pursuant to this subdivision for five consecutive twelve-month periods or (ii) makes sales of at least one million dollars from an offering or offerings pursuant to this subdivision, the seller shall, within ninety days after the earlier of either such occurrence, file with the director audited financial statements and a sales report which lists the names and addresses of all purchasers and holders of the seller's securities and the amount of securities held by such persons. Subsequent thereto, such seller shall file audited financial statements and sales reports with the director each time an additional one million dollars in securities is sold pursuant to this subdivision or after the elapse of each additional sixty-month period during which sales are made pursuant to this subdivision;

(10) Any offer or sale of a preorganization certificate or subscription if (a) no commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective subscriber, (b) the number of subscribers does not exceed ten, and (c) no payment is made by any subscriber;

(11) Any transaction pursuant to an offer to existing security holders of the issuer, including persons who at the time of the transaction are holders of convertible securities, nontransferable warrants, or transferable warrants exercisable within not more than ninety days of their issuance, if (a) no commission or other remuneration, other than a standby commission, is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any security holder in this state or (b) the issuer first files a notice specifying the terms of the offer and the director does not by order disallow the exemption within the next five full business days;

(12) Any offer, but not a sale, of a security for which registration statements have been filed under both the Securities Act of Nebraska and the Securities Act of 1933 if no stop order or refusal order is in effect and no public proceeding or examination looking toward such an order is pending under either the Securities Act of Nebraska or the Securities Act of 1933;

(13) The issuance of any stock dividend, whether the corporation distributing the dividend is the issuer of the stock or not, if nothing of value is given by the stockholders for the distribution other than the surrender of a right to a cash dividend when the stockholder can elect to take a dividend in cash or stock;

(14) Any transaction incident to a right of conversion or a statutory or judicially approved reclassification, recapitalization, reorganization, quasi-reorganization, stock split, reverse stock split, merger, consolidation, or sale of assets;

(15) Any transaction involving the issuance for cash of any evidence of ownership interest or indebtedness by a cooperative formed as a corporation under section 21-1301 or 21-1401 or a limited cooperative association formed under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act if the issuer has first filed a notice of intention to issue with the director and the director has not by order, mailed to the issuer by certified or registered mail within ten business days after receipt thereof, disallowed the exemption;

(16) Any transaction in this state not involving a public offering when (a) there is no general or public advertising or solicitation, (b) no commission or remuneration is paid directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer, except to a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer or registered issuer-dealer, (c) a notice generally describing the terms of the transaction and containing a representation that the conditions of this exemption are met is filed by the seller with the director within thirty days after the first sale for which this exemption is claimed, except that failure to give such notice may be cured by an order issued by the director in his or her discretion, (d) a filing fee of two hundred dollars is paid at the time of filing the notice, and (e) any such transaction is effected in accordance with rules and regulations of the director relating to this section when the director finds in adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations that the applicability of sections 8-1104 to 8-1107 is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors. For purposes of this subdivision, not involving a public offering means any offering in which the seller has reason to believe that the securities purchased are taken for investment and in which each offeree, by reason of his or her knowledge about the affairs of the issuer or otherwise, does not require the protections afforded by registration under sections 8-1104 to 8-1107 in order to make a reasonably informed judgment with respect to such investment;

(17) Any security issued in connection with an employees' stock purchase, savings, option, profit-sharing, pension, or similar employees' benefit plan, including any securities, plan interests, and guarantees issued under a compensatory benefit plan or compensation contract, contained in a record, established by the issuer, its parents, its majority-owned subsidiaries, or the majority-owned subsidiaries of the issuer's parent for the participation of their employees, if no commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer except to a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer. This subdivision shall apply to offers and sales to the following individuals:

(a) Directors; general partners; trustees, if the issuer is a business trust; officers; consultants; and advisors;

(b) Family members who acquire such securities from those persons through gifts or domestic relations orders;

(c) Former employees, directors, general partners, trustees, officers, consultants, and advisors if those individuals were employed by or providing services to the issuer when the securities were offered; and

(d) Insurance agents who are exclusive insurance agents of the issuer, or the issuer's subsidiaries or parents, or who derive more than fifty percent of their annual income from those organizations;

(18) Any interest in a common trust fund or similar fund maintained by a bank or trust company organized and supervised under the laws of any state or a bank organized under the laws of the United States for the collective investment and reinvestment of funds contributed to such common trust fund or similar fund by the bank or trust company in its capacity as trustee, personal representative, administrator, or guardian and any interest in a collective investment fund or similar fund maintained by the bank or trust company for the collective investment of funds contributed to such collective investment fund or similar fund by the bank or trust company in its capacity as trustee or agent which interest is issued in connection with an employee's savings, pension, profit-sharing, or similar benefit plan or a self-employed person's retirement plan, if a notice generally describing the terms of the collective investment fund or similar fund is filed by the bank or trust company with the director within thirty days after the establishment of the fund. Failure to give the notice may be cured by an order issued by the director in his or her discretion;

(19) Any transaction in which a United States Series EE Savings Bond is given or delivered with or as a bonus on account of any purchase of any item or thing;

(20) Any transaction in this state not involving a public offering by a Nebraska issuer selling solely to Nebraska residents, when (a) any such transaction is effected in accordance with rules and regulations of the director relating to this section when the director finds in adopting and promulgating such rules and regulations that the applicability of sections 8-1104 to 8-1107 is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors, (b) no commission or remuneration is paid directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer, except to a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer or registered issuer-dealer, (c) a notice generally describing the terms of the transaction and containing a representation that the conditions of this exemption are met is filed by the seller with the director no later than twenty days prior to any sales for which this exemption is claimed, except that failure to give such notice may be cured by an order issued by the director in his or her discretion, (d) a filing fee of two hundred dollars is paid at the time of filing the notice, and (e) there is no general or public advertising or solicitation;

(21) Any transaction by a person who is an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 involving an offering of interests in a fund described in section 3(c)(10)(B) of the Investment Company Act of 1940 solely to persons who are organizations described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 when (a) there is no general or public advertising or solicitation, (b) a notice generally describing the terms of the transaction and containing a representation that the conditions of this exemption are met is filed by the seller with the director within thirty days after the first sale for which this exemption is claimed, except that failure to give such notice may be cured by an order issued by the director in his or her discretion, and (c) any such transaction is effected by a trustee, director, officer, employee, or volunteer of the seller who is either a volunteer or is engaged in the overall fundraising activities of a charitable organization and receives no commission or other special compensation based on the number or the value of interests sold in the fund;

(22) Any offer or sale of any viatical settlement contract or any fractionalized or pooled interest therein in a transaction that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) Sales of such securities are made only to the following purchasers:

(i) A natural person who, either individually or jointly with the person's spouse, (A) has a minimum net worth of two hundred fifty thousand dollars and had taxable income in excess of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars in each of the two most recent years and has a reasonable expectation of reaching the same income level in the current year or (B) has a minimum net worth of five hundred thousand dollars. Net worth shall be determined exclusive of home, home furnishings, and automobiles;

(ii) A corporation, partnership, or other organization specifically formed for the purpose of acquiring securities offered by the issuer in reliance upon this exemption if each equity owner of the corporation, partnership, or other organization is a person described in subdivision (22)(a)(i) of this section;

(iii) A pension or profit-sharing trust of the issuer, a self-employed individual retirement plan, or an individual retirement account, if the investment decisions made on behalf of the trust, plan, or account are made solely by persons described in subdivision (22)(a)(i) of this section; or

(iv) An organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, or a corporation, Massachusetts or similar business trust, or partnership with total assets in excess of five million dollars according to its most recent audited financial statements;

(b) The amount of the investment of any purchaser, except a purchaser described in subdivision (a)(ii) of this subdivision, does not exceed five percent of the net worth, as determined by this subdivision, of that purchaser;

(c) Each purchaser represents that the purchaser is purchasing for the purchaser's own account or trust account, if the purchaser is a trustee, and not with a view to or for sale in connection with a distribution of the security;

(d)(i) Each purchaser receives, on or before the date the purchaser remits consideration pursuant to the purchase agreement, the following information in writing:

(A) The name, principal business and mailing addresses, and telephone number of the issuer;

(B) The suitability standards for prospective purchasers as set forth in subdivision (a) of this subdivision;

(C) A description of the issuer's type of business organization and the state in which the issuer is organized or incorporated;

(D) A brief description of the business of the issuer;

(E) If the issuer retains ownership or becomes the beneficiary of the insurance policy, an audit report from an independent certified public accountant together with a balance sheet and related statements of income, retained earnings, and cash flows that reflect the issuer's financial position, the results of the issuer's operations, and the issuer's cash flows as of a date within fifteen months before the date of the initial issuance of the securities described in this subdivision. The financial statements shall be prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. If the date of the audit report is more than one hundred twenty days before the date of the initial issuance of the securities described in this subdivision, the issuer shall provide unaudited interim financial statements;

(F) The names of all directors, officers, partners, members, or trustees of the issuer;

(G) A description of any order, judgment, or decree that is final as to the issuing entity of any state, federal, or foreign governmental agency or administrator, or of any state, federal, or foreign court of competent jurisdiction (I) revoking, suspending, denying, or censuring for cause any license, permit, or other authority of the issuer or of any director, officer, partner, member, trustee, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, ten percent or more of the outstanding interest or equity securities of the issuer, to engage in the securities, commodities, franchise, insurance, real estate, or lending business or in the offer or sale of securities, commodities, franchises, insurance, real estate, or loans, (II) permanently restraining, enjoining, barring, suspending, or censuring any such person from engaging in or continuing any conduct, practice, or employment in connection with the offer or sale of securities, commodities, franchises, insurance, real estate, or loans, (III) convicting any such person of, or pleading nolo contendere by any such person to, any felony or misdemeanor involving a security, commodity, franchise, insurance, real estate, or loan, or any aspect of the securities, commodities, franchise, insurance, real estate, or lending business, or involving dishonesty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property, or (IV) holding any such person liable in a civil action involving breach of a fiduciary duty, fraud, deceit, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property. This subdivision does not apply to any order, judgment, or decree that has been vacated or overturned or is more than ten years old;

(H) Notice of the purchaser's right to rescind or cancel the investment and receive a refund;

(I) A statement to the effect that any projected rate of return to the purchaser from the purchase of a viatical settlement contract or any fractionalized or pooled interest therein is based on an estimated life expectancy for the person insured under the life insurance policy; that the return on the purchase may vary substantially from the expected rate of return based upon the actual life expectancy of the insured that may be less than, may be equal to, or may greatly exceed the estimated life expectancy; and that the rate of return would be higher if the actual life expectancy were less than, and lower if the actual life expectancy were greater than, the estimated life expectancy of the insured at the time the viatical settlement contract was closed;

(J) A statement that the purchaser should consult with his or her tax advisor regarding the tax consequences of the purchase of the viatical settlement contract or any fractionalized or pooled interest therein; and

(K) Any other information as may be prescribed by rule and regulation or order of the director; and

(ii) The purchaser receives in writing at least five business days prior to closing the transaction:

(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the issuing insurance company and the name, address, and telephone number of the state or foreign country regulator of the insurance company;

(B) The total face value of the insurance policy and the percentage of the insurance policy the purchaser will own;

(C) The insurance policy number, issue date, and type;

(D) If a group insurance policy, the name, address, and telephone number of the group and, if applicable, the material terms and conditions of converting the policy to an individual policy, including the amount of increased premiums;

(E) If a term insurance policy, the term and the name, address, and telephone number of the person who will be responsible for renewing the policy if necessary;

(F) That the insurance policy is beyond the state statute for contestability and the reason therefor;

(G) The insurance policy premiums and terms of premium payments;

(H) The amount of the purchaser's money that will be set aside to pay premiums;

(I) The name, address, and telephone number of the person who will be the insurance policyowner and the person who will be responsible for paying premiums;

(J) The date on which the purchaser will be required to pay premiums and the amount of the premium, if known; and

(K) Any other information as may be prescribed by rule and regulation or order of the director;

(e) The purchaser may rescind or cancel the purchase for any reason by giving written notice of rescission or cancellation to the issuer or the issuer's agent within (i) fifteen calendar days after the date the purchaser remits the required consideration or receives the disclosure required under subdivision (d)(i) of this subdivision and (ii) five business days after the date the purchaser receives the disclosure required by subdivision (d)(ii) of this subdivision. No specific form is required for the rescission or cancellation. The notice is effective when personally delivered, deposited in the United States mail, or deposited with a commercial courier or delivery service. The issuer shall refund all the purchaser's money within seven calendar days after receiving the notice of rescission or cancellation;

(f) A notice of the issuer's intent to sell securities pursuant to this subdivision, signed by a duly authorized officer of the issuer and notarized, together with a filing fee of two hundred dollars, is filed with the department before any offers or sales of securities are made under this subdivision. Such notice shall include:

(i) The issuer's name, the issuer's type of organization, the state in which the issuer is organized, the date the issuer intends to begin selling securities within or from this state, and the issuer's principal business;

(ii) A consent to service of process; and

(iii) An audit report of an independent certified public accountant together with a balance sheet and related statements of income, retained earnings and cash flows that reflect the issuer's financial position, the results of the issuer's operations, and the issuer's cash flows as of a date within fifteen months before the date of the notice prescribed in this subdivision. The financial statements shall be prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and shall be examined according to generally accepted auditing standards. If the date of the audit report is more than one hundred twenty days before the date of the notice prescribed in this subdivision, the issuer shall provide unaudited interim financial statements;

(g) No commission or remuneration is paid directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective purchaser, except to a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer or registered issuer-dealer; and

(h) At least ten days before use within this state, the issuer files with the department all advertising and sales materials that will be published, exhibited, broadcast, or otherwise used, directly or indirectly, in the offer or sale of a viatical settlement contract in this state;

(23) Any transaction in this state not involving a public offering by a Nebraska issuer selling solely to Nebraska residents when:

(a) The proceeds from all sales of securities by the issuer in any two-year period do not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or such greater amount as from time to time may be set in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director to adjust the amount to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers as prepared by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and at least eighty percent of the proceeds are used in Nebraska;

(b) No commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective buyer except to a registered agent of a registered broker-dealer;

(c) The issuer, any partner or limited liability company member of the issuer, any officer, director, or any person occupying a similar status of the issuer, any person performing similar functions for the issuer, or any person holding a direct or indirect ownership interest in the issuer or in any way a beneficial interest in such sale of securities of the issuer, has not been:

(i) Found by a final order of any state or federal administrative agency or a court of competent jurisdiction to have violated any provision of the Securities Act of Nebraska or a similar act of any other state or of the United States;

(ii) Convicted of any felony or misdemeanor in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of any security or any felony involving fraud or deceit, including, but not limited to, forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, or conspiracy to defraud;

(iii) Found by any state or federal administrative agency or court of competent jurisdiction to have engaged in fraud or deceit, including, but not limited to, making an untrue statement of a material fact or omitting to state a material fact; or

(iv) Temporarily or preliminarily restrained or enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice in connection with the purchase or sale of any security or involving the making of any false filing with any state or with the Securities and Exchange Commission;

(d)(i) At least fifteen business days prior to the offer or sale, the issuer files a notice with the director, which notice shall include:

(A) The name, address, telephone number, and email address of the issuer;

(B) The name and address of each person holding direct or indirect ownership or beneficial interest in the issuer;

(C) The amount of the offering; and

(D) The type of security being offered, the manner in which purchasers will be solicited, and a statement made upon oath or affirmation that the conditions of this exemption have been or will be met.

(ii) Failure to give such notice may be cured by an order issued by the director in his or her discretion;

(e) Prior to payment of consideration for the securities, the offeree receives a written disclosure statement containing (i) a description of the proposed use of the proceeds of the offering; (ii) the name of each partner or limited liability company member of the issuer, officer, director, or person occupying a similar status of the issuer or performing similar functions for the issuer; and (iii) the financial condition of the issuer;

(f) The purchaser signs a subscription agreement in which the purchaser acknowledges that he or she:

(i) Has received the written disclosure statement;

(ii) Understands the investment involves a high level of risk; and

(iii) Has the financial resources to withstand the total loss of the money invested; and

(g) The issuer, within thirty days after the completion of the offering, files with the department a statement indicating the number of investors, the total dollar amount raised, and the use of the offering proceeds; or

(24)(a) An offer or a sale of a security made after August 30, 2015, by an issuer if the offer or sale is conducted in accordance with all the following requirements:

(i) The issuer of the security is a business entity organized under the laws of Nebraska and authorized to do business in Nebraska;

(ii) The transaction meets the requirements of the federal exemption for intrastate offerings in section 3(a)(11) of the Securities Act of 1933 and Rule 147 adopted under the Securities Act of 1933, or complies with Rule 147A adopted under the Securities Act of 1933;

(iii) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of this subdivision, the sum of all cash and other consideration to be received for all sales of the security in reliance on the exemption under this subdivision, excluding sales to any accredited investor, does not exceed the following amount:

(A) If the issuer has not undergone, and made available to each prospective investor and the director the documentation resulting from, a financial audit of its most recently completed fiscal year that complies with generally accepted accounting principles, one million dollars, less the aggregate amount received for all sales of securities by the issuer within the twelve months before the first offer or sale made in reliance on the exemption under this subdivision; or

(B) If the issuer has undergone, and made available to each prospective investor and the director the documentation resulting from, a financial audit of its most recently completed fiscal year that complies with generally accepted accounting principles, two million dollars, less the aggregate amount received for all sales of securities by the issuer within the twelve months before the first offer or sale made in reliance on the exemption under this subdivision;

(iv) The issuer does not accept more than five thousand dollars from any single purchaser except that such limitation shall not apply to an accredited investor;

(v) Unless waived by written consent by the director, not less than ten days before the commencement of an offering of securities in reliance on the exemption under this subdivision, the issuer must do all the following:

(A) Make a notice filing with the department on a form prescribed by the director;

(B) Pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars. However, no filing fee is required to file amendments to the form;

(C) Provide the director a copy of the disclosure document to be provided to prospective investors under subdivision (a)(xi) of this subdivision;

(D) Provide the director a copy of an escrow agreement with a bank, regulated trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized to do business in Nebraska in which the issuer will deposit the investor funds or cause the investor funds to be deposited. The bank, regulated trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union in which the investor funds are deposited is only responsible to act at the direction of the party establishing the escrow agreement and does not have any duty or liability, contractual or otherwise, to any investor or other person;

(E) The issuer shall not access the escrow funds until the aggregate funds raised from all investors equals or exceeds the minimum amount specified in the escrow agreement; and

(F) An investor may cancel the investor's commitment to invest if the target offering amount is not raised before the time stated in the escrow agreement;

(vi) The issuer is not, either before or as a result of the offering, an investment company, as defined in section 3 of the Investment Company Act of 1940, an entity that would be an investment company but for the exclusions provided in section 3(c) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, or subject to the reporting requirements of section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

(vii) The issuer informs all prospective purchasers of securities offered under an exemption under this subdivision that the securities have not been registered under federal or state securities law and that the securities are subject to limitations on resale. The issuer shall display the following legend conspicuously on the cover page of the disclosure document:

IN MAKING AN INVESTMENT DECISION, INVESTORS MUST RELY ON THEIR OWN EXAMINATION OF THE ISSUER AND THE TERMS OF THE OFFERING, INCLUDING THE MERITS AND RISKS INVOLVED. THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN RECOMMENDED BY ANY FEDERAL OR STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION, DEPARTMENT, OR DIVISION OR OTHER REGULATORY AUTHORITY. FURTHERMORE, THE FOREGOING AUTHORITIES HAVE NOT CONFIRMED THE ACCURACY OR DETERMINED THE ADEQUACY OF THIS DOCUMENT. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE. THESE SECURITIES ARE SUBJECT TO RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFERABILITY AND RESALE AND MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED OR RESOLD EXCEPT AS PERMITTED BY SUBSECTION (e) OF SEC RULE 147 OR SUBSECTION (e) OF RULE 147A ADOPTED UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933 AND THE APPLICABLE STATE SECURITIES LAWS, PURSUANT TO REGISTRATION OR EXEMPTION THEREFROM. INVESTORS SHOULD BE AWARE THAT THEY WILL BE REQUIRED TO BEAR THE FINANCIAL RISKS OF THIS INVESTMENT FOR AN INDEFINITE PERIOD OF TIME.;

(viii) The issuer requires each purchaser to certify in writing or electronically as follows:

I understand and acknowledge that I am investing in a high-risk, speculative business venture. I may lose all of my investment, or under some circumstances more than my investment, and I can afford this loss. This offering has not been reviewed or approved by any state or federal securities commission, department, or division or other regulatory authority and no such person or authority has confirmed the accuracy or determined the adequacy of any disclosure made to me relating to this offering. The securities I am acquiring in this offering are illiquid, there is no ready market for the sale of such securities, it may be difficult or impossible for me to sell or otherwise dispose of this investment, and, accordingly, I may be required to hold this investment indefinitely. I may be subject to tax on my share of the taxable income and losses of the company, whether or not I have sold or otherwise disposed of my investment or received any dividends or other distributions from the company.;

(ix) The issuer obtains from each purchaser of a security offered under an exemption under this subdivision evidence that the purchaser is a resident of Nebraska and, if applicable, is an individual accredited investor;

(x) All payments for purchase of securities offered under an exemption under this subdivision are directed to and held by the financial institution specified in subdivision (a)(v)(D) of this subdivision. The director may request from the financial institutions information necessary to ensure compliance with this section. This information is not a public record and is not available for public inspection;

(xi) The issuer of securities offered under an exemption under this subdivision provides a disclosure document to each prospective investor at the time the offer of securities is made to the prospective investor that contains all the following:

(A) A description of the company, its type of entity, the address and telephone number of its principal office, its history, its business plan, and the intended use of the offering proceeds, including any amounts to be paid, as compensation or otherwise, to any owner, executive officer, director, managing member, or other person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions on behalf of the issuer;

(B) The identity of all persons owning more than twenty percent of the ownership interests of any class of securities of the company;

(C) The identity of the executive officers, directors, managing members, and other persons occupying a similar status or performing similar functions in the name of and on behalf of the issuer, including their titles and their prior experience;

(D) The terms and conditions of the securities being offered and of any outstanding securities of the company; the minimum and maximum amount of securities being offered, if any; either the percentage ownership of the company represented by the offered securities or the valuation of the company implied by the price of the offered securities; the price per share, unit, or interest of the securities being offered; any restrictions on transfer of the securities being offered; and a disclosure of any anticipated future issuance of securities that might dilute the value of securities being offered;

(E) The identity of any person who has been or will be retained by the issuer to assist the issuer in conducting the offering and sale of the securities, including any portal operator but excluding persons acting solely as accountants or attorneys and employees whose primary job responsibilities involve the operating business of the issuer rather than assisting the issuer in raising capital;

(F) For each person identified as required in subdivision (a)(xi)(E) of this subdivision, a description of the consideration being paid to the person for such assistance;

(G) A description of any litigation, legal proceedings, or pending regulatory action involving the company or its management;

(H) The names and addresses of each portal operator that will be offering or selling the issuer's securities under an exemption under this subdivision;

(I) The Uniform Resource Locator for each funding portal that will be used by the portal operator to offer or sell the issuer's securities under an exemption under this subdivision; and

(J) Any additional information material to the offering, including, if appropriate, a discussion of significant factors that make the offering speculative or risky. This discussion must be concise and organized logically and may not be limited to risks that could apply to any issuer or any offering;

(xii) The offering or sale exempted under this subdivision is made exclusively through one or more funding portals and each funding portal is subject to the following:

(A) Before any offer or sale of securities, the issuer must provide to the portal operator evidence that the issuer is organized under the laws of Nebraska and is authorized to do business in Nebraska;

(B) Subject to subdivisions (a)(xii)(C) and (E) of this subdivision, the portal operator must register with the department by filing a statement, accompanied by a two-hundred-dollar filing fee, that includes the following information:

(I) Documentation which demonstrates that the portal operator is a business entity and authorized to do business in Nebraska;

(II) A representation that the funding portal is being used to offer and sell securities pursuant to the exemption under this subdivision; and

(III) The identity and location of, and contact information for, the portal operator;

(C) The portal operator is not required to register as a broker-dealer if all of the following apply with respect to the funding portal and its portal operator:

(I) It does not offer investment advice or recommendations;

(II) It does not solicit purchases, sales, or offers to buy the securities offered or displayed on the funding portal;

(III) It does not compensate employees, agents, or other persons for the solicitation or based on the sale of securities displayed or referenced on the funding portal;

(IV) It is not compensated based on the amount of securities sold, and it does not hold, manage, possess, or otherwise handle investor funds or securities;

(V) The fee it charges an issuer for an offering of securities on the funding portal is a fixed amount for each offering, a variable amount based on the length of time that the securities are offered on the funding portal, or a combination of the fixed and variable amounts;

(VI) It does not identify, promote, or otherwise refer to any individual security offered on the funding portal in any advertising for the funding portal;

(VII) It does not engage in any other activities that the director, by rule and regulation or order, determines are prohibited of the funding portal; and

(VIII) Neither the portal operator, nor any director, executive officer, general partner, managing member, or other person with management authority over the portal operator, has been subject to any conviction, order, judgment, decree, or other action specified in Rule 506(d)(1) adopted under the Securities Act of 1933, that would disqualify an issuer under Rule 506(d) adopted under the Securities Act of 1933, from claiming an exemption specified in Rule 506(a) to Rule 506(c) adopted under the Securities Act of 1933. However, this subdivision does not apply if both of the following are met:

(1) On a showing of good cause and without prejudice to any other action by the Director of Banking and Finance, the director determines that it is not necessary under the circumstances that an exemption is denied; and

(2) The portal operator establishes that it made a factual inquiry into whether any disqualification existed under this subdivision but did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known, that a disqualification existed under this subdivision. The nature and scope of the requisite inquiry will vary based on the circumstances of the issuer and the other offering participants;

(D) If any change occurs that affects the funding portal's registration exemption, the portal operator must notify the department within thirty days after the change occurs;

(E) A registered broker-dealer who also serves as a portal operator must register with the department as a portal operator pursuant to subdivision (a)(xii)(B) of this subdivision, except that the fee for registration shall be waived;

(F) The issuer and the portal operator must maintain records of all offers and sales of securities effected through the funding portal and must provide ready access to the records to the department, upon request. The records of a portal operator under this subdivision are subject to the reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the director, in or outside Nebraska, as the director considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The director may copy, and remove for audit or inspection copies of, all records the director reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The director may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subdivision;

(G) The portal operator shall limit web site access to the offer or sale of securities to only Nebraska residents;

(H) The portal operator shall not hold, manage, possess, or handle investor funds or securities; and

(I) The portal operator may not be an investor in any Nebraska offering under this subdivision.

(b) An issuer of a security, the offer and sale of which is exempt under this subdivision, shall provide, free of charge, a quarterly report to the issuer's investors until no securities issued under an exemption under this subdivision are outstanding. An issuer may satisfy the reporting requirement of this subdivision by making the information available on a funding portal if the information is made available within forty-five days after the end of each fiscal quarter and remains available until the succeeding quarterly report is issued. An issuer shall file each quarterly report under this subdivision with the department and, if the quarterly report is made available on a funding portal, the issuer shall also provide a written copy of the report to any investor upon request. The report must contain all the following:

(i) Compensation received by each director and executive officer, including cash compensation earned since the previous report and on an annual basis and any bonuses, stock options, other rights to receive securities of the issuer or any affiliate of the issuer, or other compensation received; and

(ii) An analysis by management of the issuer of the business operations and financial condition of the issuer.

(c) An offer or a sale under this subdivision to an officer, director, partner, trustee, or individual occupying similar status or performing similar functions with respect to the issuer or to a person owning ten percent or more of the outstanding shares of any class or classes of securities of the issuer does not count toward the monetary limitations in subdivision (a)(iii) of this subdivision.

(d) The exemption under this subdivision may not be used in conjunction with any other exemption under the Securities Act of Nebraska, except for offers and sales to individuals identified in the disclosure document, during the immediately preceding twelve-month period.

(e) The exemption under this subdivision does not apply if an issuer or any director, executive officer, general partner, managing member, or other person with management authority over the issuer, has been subject to any conviction, order, judgment, decree, or other action specified in Rule 506(d)(1) adopted under the Securities Act of 1933, that would disqualify an issuer under Rule 506(d) adopted under the Securities Act of 1933, from claiming an exemption specified in Rule 506(a) to Rule 506(c) adopted under the Securities Act of 1933. However, this subdivision does not apply if both of the following are met:

(i) On a showing of good cause and without prejudice to any other action by the Director of Banking and Finance, the director determines that it is not necessary under the circumstances that an exemption is denied; and

(ii) The issuer establishes that it made a factual inquiry into whether any disqualification existed under this subdivision but did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known, that a disqualification existed under this subdivision. The nature and scope of the requisite inquiry will vary based on the circumstances of the issuer and the other offering participants.

(f) For purposes of this subdivision:

(i) Accredited investor means a bank, a savings institution, a trust company, an insurance company, an investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, a pension or profit-sharing trust or other financial institution or institutional buyer, an individual accredited investor, or a broker-dealer, whether the purchaser is acting for itself or in some fiduciary capacity;

(ii) Funding portal means an Internet web site that is operated by a portal operator for the offer and sale of securities pursuant to this subdivision;

(iii) Individual accredited investor means (A) any director, executive officer, or general partner of the issuer of the securities being offered or sold, or any director, executive officer, or general partner of a general partner of that issuer, (B) any manager of a limited liability company that is the issuer of the securities being offered or sold, (C) any natural person whose individual net worth, or joint net worth with that person's spouse, at the time of his or her purchase, exceeds one million dollars, excluding the value of the primary residence of such person, or (D) any natural person who had an individual income in excess of two hundred thousand dollars in each of the two most recent years or joint income with that person's spouse in excess of three hundred thousand dollars in each of those years and has a reasonable expectation of reaching the same income level in the current year; and

(iv) Portal operator means an entity authorized to do business in this state which operates a funding portal and has registered with the department as required by this subdivision.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 11, p. 1787;

Laws 1973, LB 167, § 6;

Laws 1977, LB 263, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 760, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 496, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 909, § 11;

Laws 1987, LB 93, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 60, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 956, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 305, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 758, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 216, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1241, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 96, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1053, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 335, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 44;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB814, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB76, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB205, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB214, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB226, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB148, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB259, § 5.

Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act, see section 21-2901.

Exemption for a transaction under subsection (9) of this section contemplates only a situation where no remuneration in any form is to be given the offeror of the stock. Labenz v. Labenz, 198 Neb. 548, 253 N.W.2d 855 (1977).